Washington statutes.
RCW 28C.10.090

Actions prohibited without license.

A private vocational school, whether located in this state or outside of this state, shall not conduct business of any kind, make any offers, advertise or solicit, or enter into any contracts unless the private vocational school is licensed under this chapter.

[ 1986 c 299 s 9.]